Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Overlapping Franchises

7-59-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cable service” means:

The one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming or other programming service; and

Subscriber interaction, if any, that is required for the selection of such video programming or other programming service;

“Cable system” means a facility consisting of a set of closed transmission paths and associated signal generation, reception, and control equipment that is designed to provide cable service that includes video programming and that is provided to multiple subscribers within a community; but “cable system” does not include:

A facility that serves only to retransmit the television signals of one (1) or more television broadcast stations;

A facility that serves only subscribers in one (1) or more multiple unit dwellings under common ownership, control, or management, unless such facility or facilities use any public right-of-way;

A facility of a common carrier, except that such facility shall be considered a cable system to the extent such facility is used in the transmission of video programming directly to subscribers; or

Any facilities of any electric utility used solely for operating its electric utility system;

“Franchise” means an initial authorization or renewal of an authorization issued by a franchising authority, whether such authorization is designated as a franchise, permit, license, resolution, contract, certificate, agreement, or otherwise, that authorizes the construction or operation of a cable system;

“Franchising authority” means any governmental entity empowered by federal, state, or local law to grant a franchise;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, corporation, or governmental entity; and

“Video programming” means programming provided by, or generally considered comparable to programming provided by, a television broadcast station or cable system.

Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1.

7-59-202. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-59-202 (Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1), concerning public notices and hearings for the granting of franchises for cable service, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 25, effective July 1, 2008.

7-59-203. More favorable terms prohibited.

No municipality or county shall grant any overlapping franchises for cable or video service within its jurisdiction on terms or conditions more favorable or less burdensome than those in any existing cable or video franchise within the municipality or county.

Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1; 2008, ch. 932, § 26.

7-59-204. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-59-204 (Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1), concerning the applicability of certain provisions of title 59, chapter 7, part 2, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 27, effective July 1, 2008.

7-59-205. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-59-205 (Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1), concerning the ability of municipalities and counties to impose additional terms and conditions upon the granting of cable franchises, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 28, effective July 1, 2008.

7-59-206. Existing franchises.

All cable service franchises in existence on July 1, 1988, shall remain in full force and effect according to their terms.

Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1.

7-59-207. Renewal of franchises.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to alter or amend the process or procedure for renewal of franchises in existence on July 1, 1988.

Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 1.

7-59-208. Franchise requests.

This part shall not affect any franchise request filed in an area with an existing franchise prior to July 1, 1988.

Acts 1988, ch. 675, § 2.